Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.6, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1290.6.


PROHIBITED AMMUNITION


Any concealed or unconcealed handgun when carried in a manner


authorized by the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and


when loaded with any ammunition which is either a restricted bullet


as defined by Section 1289.19 of this title or is larger than .45


caliber or is otherwise prohibited by law shall be deemed a


prohibited weapon for purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.


Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be


punished for a criminal offense as provided by Section 1272 of this

Req. No. 3158 Page 1


title or any other applicable provision of law. In addition to any


criminal prosecution for a violation of the provisions of this


section, the licensee shall be subject to an administrative fine of


Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), upon a hearing and determination by


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation that the person is in


violation of the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3158 CN 1/14/2026 10:18:29 AM































Req. No. 3158 Page 2